Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-535
Governing law.

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign series limited liability company governs:

(1) the internal affairs of a foreign protected series of the company, including:

(A) relations among any associated members of the foreign protected series;

(B) relations between the foreign protected series and:

(i) any associated member;

(ii) the protected-series manager; or

(iii) any protected-series transferee;

(C) relations between any associated member and:

(i) the protected-series manager; or

(ii) any protected-series transferee;

(D) the rights and duties of a protected-series manager;

(E) governance decisions affecting the activities and affairs of the foreign protected series and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

(F) procedures and conditions for becoming an associated member or protected-series transferee;

(2) relations between the foreign protected series and:

(A) the company;

(B) another foreign protected series of the company;

(C) a member of the company which is not an associated member of the foreign protected series;

(D) a foreign protected-series manager that is not a protected-series manager of the protected series;

(E) a foreign protected-series transferee that is not a foreign protected-series transferee of the protected series; and

(F) a transferee of a transferable interest of the company;

(3) except as otherwise provided in sections 21-521 and 21-523, the liability of a person for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the person being or acting as:

(A) an associated member, protected-series transferee, or protected-series manager of the foreign protected series;

(B) a member of the company which is not an associated member of the foreign protected series;

(C) a protected-series manager of another foreign protected series of the company;

(D) a protected-series transferee of another foreign protected series of the company;

(E) a manager of the company; or

(F) a transferee of a transferable interest of the company; and

(4) except as otherwise provided in sections 21-521 and 21-523:

(A) the liability of the foreign series limited liability company for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a foreign protected series of the company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the foreign protected series being a foreign protected series of the company or the company:

(i) being or acting as a foreign protected-series manager of the foreign protected series;

(ii) having the foreign protected series manage the company; or

(iii) owning a protected-series transferable interest of the foreign protected series; and

(B) the liability of a foreign protected series for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the company or another foreign protected series of the company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the foreign protected series:

(i) being a foreign protected series of the company or having the company or another foreign protected series of the company be or act as foreign protected-series manager of the foreign protected series; or

(ii) managing the company or being or acting as a foreign protected-series manager of another foreign protected series of the company.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 36.